Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 5 JUVENILE CORRECTIONS ACT
§ 20-526. Encouraging violations.

Any person who by any act or neglect encourages, aids or causes a juvenile to come within the purview or jurisdiction of this chapter, or who after notice that the driving privileges of the juvenile offender have been suspended or restricted under the provisions of this chapter knowingly permits or encourages said juvenile offender to operate a motor vehicle in violation of such suspension or restriction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The court may impose conditions upon any person found guilty under this section, and so long as such person shall comply therewith to the satisfaction of the court, the sentence imposed may be suspended.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 17, p. 876; am. 1977, ch. 156, § 5, p. 399; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 27, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 23, p. 39.

§ 20-527. School trustees to report truants.

When a juvenile of compulsory school age is expelled or is reported to have repeatedly violated the attendance regulations of the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled, pursuant to section 33-206, Idaho Code, the prosecuting attorney may file a petition under this act. The court shall cause an investigation to be made and upon receipt of the written report of the investigation, the court may proceed under this act or the child protective act with respect to the juvenile and may proceed against the juvenile’s parent(s), guardian or custodian under this act pursuant to section 33-207, Idaho Code.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 18, p. 876; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 28, p. 65; am. 2002, ch. 348, § 3, p. 994.

§ 20-528. Appeals.

All orders or final judgments made by any court in matters affecting a juvenile offender within the purview of this act may be appealed by the juvenile offender or the state. A decision by the court pursuant to section 20-508, Idaho Code, not to waive jurisdiction under this act over the juvenile offender may be appealed by the state. Appeals shall be reviewed as provided by the appellate rules of the supreme court of Idaho, except no undertaking shall be required. Upon filing of the notice of appeal, the district court shall take jurisdiction of the case and if the juvenile offender is in detention shall promptly hold a hearing after the filing of a request to determine whether the juvenile offender shall remain in detention.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 19, p. 876; am. 1971, ch. 170, § 3, p. 805; am. 1980, ch. 134, § 1, p. 293; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 29, p. 65; am. 1997, ch. 54, § 1, p. 92; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 24, p. 39.

§ 20-529. Appointment of county probation officers.

The courts in the several counties of this state shall enter into a contract or agreement for probation services to the counties or, if the court deems local probation services are preferable, may appoint one (1) or more persons to serve as probation officers at the expense of the county with the concurrence of the county commissioners. County juvenile probation services may be paid for from funds generated by the fees collected pursuant to the provisions of section 20-520, Idaho Code, and any additional funds that may be annually appropriated by the board of county commissioners.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 20, p. 876; am. 1976, ch. 272, § 1, p. 920; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 30, p. 65; am. 2019, ch. 219, § 3, p. 662.

§ 20-530. Reassessment of committed juvenile offenders — Records — Failure to reassess.

The department shall make periodic reassessments of all juvenile offenders committed to it for the purpose of determining whether existing orders and dispositions in individual cases should be modified or continued in force. Assessments may be made as frequently as the department considers desirable and shall be made with respect to every juvenile offender at intervals not exceeding one (1) year. Reports of periodic reassessments made pursuant to this section shall be filed with the court from which the juvenile offender was committed.

The department shall keep written records of assessments, prognosis, and all orders concerning disposition or treatment of every juvenile offender committed to it.

Failure of the department to assess a committed juvenile offender or to reassess him within one (1) year of a previous assessment shall not of itself entitle the juvenile offender to discharge from the control of the department but shall entitle him to petition the committing court for an order of discharge and the court shall discharge him unless the department satisfies the court of the need for further control.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 23, p. 876; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 32, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 25, p. 39.

§ 20-531. Secure facilities.

The department shall maintain and operate secure facilities for the custody of juvenile offenders who pose a danger of serious bodily harm to others or who have engaged in a pattern of serious criminal offenses, and who cannot be controlled in a less secure setting.

The department shall provide or make available to juvenile offenders in secure facilities, instruction appropriate to the age, needs and range of abilities of the juvenile offenders. An assessment shall be made of each juvenile offender at the secure facility to determine abilities, learning disabilities, interests, attitudes and similar matters. Training in the development of competency and life skills designed to assist the juvenile offender in operating effectively within and becoming a contributing member of the community shall be provided. Prevocational education shall be provided to acquaint juvenile offenders with vocations, their requirements and opportunities.

The department shall place juvenile offenders committed to the department in a state or privately operated secure facility that provides humane care and developmental opportunities for the juvenile offender while promoting accountability and community protection.

The department shall adopt standards, policies and procedures for the regulation and operation of secure facilities. Such standards, policies and procedures shall not be inconsistent with law. Policies shall be promulgated as rules in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1827, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 34, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 26, p. 39.

§ 20-532. Term of commitment — Review after commitment.

A juvenile offender committed to a secure facility shall remain until the juvenile offender reaches nineteen (19) years of age, is retained for extended custody pursuant to section 20-520(1)(s), Idaho Code, or is released or discharged. A juvenile offender committed to a secure facility shall appear before the department within ninety (90) days after commitment for review of treatment plans.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1828, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 35, p. 65; am. 2002, ch. 309, § 2, p. 880; am. 2007, ch. 308, § 4, p. 862; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 27, p. 39; am. 2019, ch. 219, § 4, p. 662.

§ 20-532A. Order for apprehension and detention of escapees from custody.

Upon a finding by the Idaho department of juvenile corrections that a juvenile offender in the custody of the department has escaped, as described in section 18-2505(2) or 18-2506(2), Idaho Code, a written order signed by the director or his designee shall be a sufficient order for detention for any law enforcement officer to apprehend and take into custody such person. It is hereby made the duty of all sheriffs, police, constables, parole officers, prison officials and other peace officers to execute such order. From and after the issuance of the detention order and until taken into custody, the escapee shall be considered a fugitive from justice. Upon apprehension, the juvenile offender shall be detained in the closest available detention center and shall thereafter be transported by the department as soon as possible or, at the discretion of the detaining authority, the juvenile offender may be transported directly by that authority to the department’s nearest regional facility.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-532A, as added by 2000, ch. 105, § 1, p. 234; am. 2004, ch. 50, § 5, p. 236; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 28, p. 39; am. 2018, ch. 158, § 1, p. 315.

§ 20-533. Release from custody of the department.

The department shall determine an appropriate date for release of the juvenile offender from the custody of the department, based upon guidelines established by the department. The department shall review and update policy guidelines annually.

Juvenile offenders may be released to their own home, to a residential community-based program, to a nonresidential community-based treatment program, to an approved independent living setting, or to other appropriate residences, but shall remain on probation until the probation is terminated by the court. Following the release of a juvenile offender, the court may conduct a hearing to review the juvenile offender’s conditions of probation and determine whether existing conditions should be amended or eliminated or additional conditions imposed.

County probation officers shall enforce probation conditions and supervise juvenile offenders while on probation. As authorized by court order, probation officers may establish additional reasonable conditions of probation with which the juvenile offender must comply. The juvenile offender may move for a hearing before the court to contest any conditions imposed by the probation officer. If the probation officer establishes additional conditions of probation, the probation officer shall advise the juvenile offender at the time such additional conditions are imposed of the juvenile offender’s right to move the court for a hearing to contest those conditions.

When the department is considering release of a juvenile offender committed to the department for confinement, the department shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county from which the juvenile offender was committed to confinement, the judge whose order caused the juvenile offender to be committed to confinement and the victims of the juvenile offender’s unlawful conduct. Notice shall also be given to the same parties upon the actual release of the juvenile offender from the department’s custody.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1829, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 36, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 29, p. 39; am. 2018, ch. 157, § 1, p. 314.

§ 20-533A. Compliance with open meetings law — Executive sessions authorized — Confidentiality of records.

All meetings of the custody review board of the Idaho department of juvenile corrections shall be held in accordance with the open meetings law as provided in chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, provided however:

Deliberations and decisions of the board concerning whether or not a juvenile offender shall be held in custody of the Idaho department of juvenile corrections for an extended period of time past his or her nineteenth birthday may be made in executive session; and

Votes of individual members in custody decisions shall not be made public, provided that the board shall maintain a record of the votes of the individual members as required in subsection (2) of this section.

A written record of the vote to retain the juvenile offender in custody for an extended period of time by each board member in each case reviewed by that member shall be produced by the board. Such record shall be kept confidential and privileged from disclosure, provided the record shall be made available upon request to the governor, the chairman of the senate judiciary and rules committee and the chairman of the house of representatives judiciary, rules and administration committee for all lawful purposes.

A board member or employee of the Idaho department of juvenile corrections who distributes to any person not specifically listed in this section any hearing information or records that are legally required to be kept confidential shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent any person from obtaining the results of any action by the board or director of the Idaho department of juvenile corrections without reference to the manner in which any member voted, and the board shall make such information public unless doing so would violate public records laws.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the director, designated staff of the director, the governor, the chairman of the senate judiciary and rules committee or the chairman of the house of representatives judiciary, rules and administration committee from attending any meeting, including any executive session, of the custody review board.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-533A, as added by 2003, ch. 164, § 2, p. 462; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 30, p. 39; am. 2017, ch. 58, § 10, p. 91; am. 2017, ch. 87, § 1, p. 234.

§ 20-534. Magistrate court probation sections to furnish information to department.

Probation sections of the magistrate division of the district court shall render full and complete cooperation to the department in supplying the department with all pertinent information relating to juvenile offenders committed to the department. This information may include, without limitation, prior criminal history, social history, psychological evaluations, and identifying information specified by the department.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1836, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 38, p. 65.

§ 20-535. Review of programs for juvenile offenders — Certification.

The department shall annually review all state operated or state contracted programs which provide services to juvenile offenders and certify compliance with standards provided by the department. Written reviews shall be provided to the managers of those programs. Based upon policies established by the department, those programs which are unable or unwilling to comply with approved standards may not be certified. Any person owning or operating a private facility who willfully fails to comply with the standards established by the department shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1837, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 39, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 31, p. 39.

§ 20-536. Contracts with private providers of services for juvenile offenders — Certification required.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the department from contracting with private providers or other entities for the provision of care, treatment and supervision of juvenile offenders committed to the custody of the department, if these programs are certified as in compliance with department standards within six (6) months after commencing operation.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1838, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 40, p. 65.

§ 20-537. Program records as property of department — Control of records.

All records maintained by providers under contract with the department to provide services to juvenile offenders are the property of the department and shall be returned to it when the juvenile offenders are terminated from the provider’s programs. The department shall maintain an accurate audit trail of information provided to other programs, providers or agencies regarding juvenile offenders under its jurisdiction.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1839, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 41, p. 65.

§ 20-538. Restitution to victims of juvenile offenders — Duties of department.

The department or county probation shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that restitution is made to the victim of the juvenile offender. Restitution may be made through the employment of juvenile offenders in work programs or directly to the person; provided, however, that reimbursement to the victim is conditional upon the juvenile offender’s involvement in such program.

Restitution may be made a condition of probation.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1840, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 42, p. 65.

§ 20-539. Creation of fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund known as the “juvenile corrections victim restitution fund,” which shall be administered by the department. Moneys in the fund shall consist of wage payments made to juvenile offenders in work programs, appropriations and moneys received by the department from whatever source. Moneys in the fund shall be utilized to provide full or partial restitution to victims of the juvenile offender’s delinquent behavior.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1841, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 43, p. 65; am. 2001, ch. 14, § 1, p. 16.

§ 20-539A. Distribution and reporting requirements for state, other public and private contract facilities.

Each facility housing juvenile offenders in department custody, whether a state, other public or private contract facility, shall comply with the following requirements for disbursement and reporting:

State facilities, upon receiving any moneys credited to a juvenile offender in its custody, shall deposit the funds in the juvenile corrections victim restitution fund pursuant to section 20-539, Idaho Code.

Other public or private contract facilities housing juvenile offenders in department custody, upon receiving any moneys credited to or earned by a juvenile offender at the facility, shall directly distribute the moneys on or before the first day of each calendar quarter to the county court that committed the juvenile offender to department custody. Upon remitting moneys to a county on behalf of a juvenile offender, the facility shall report the direct distribution to the department for inclusion in the department’s records.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-539A, as added by 2001, ch. 14, § 2, p. 16; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 32, p. 39.

§ 20-540. Reports by department.

When a juvenile offender has been committed to the department pursuant to this chapter, the department shall supply a report of the juvenile offender’s educational and developmental progress to the committing court as often as the court deems necessary in its order of commitment, but not less frequently than every three (3) months.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1844, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 45, p. 65.

§ 20-541. Special commissioner — Duties.

The court shall be authorized to appoint a special commissioner to assist in the conduct of proceedings under this chapter. In any case in which the court refers a petition to the commissioner, the commissioner shall promptly cause the matter to be investigated and on the basis thereof shall either recommend dismissal of the petition or hold a hearing as provided in this act and make recommendations to the court regarding the disposition of the matter. Such commissioner shall be paid for services rendered on order of the court from county funds in such amount as is determined by the court.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1847, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 47, p. 65.

§ 20-542. Juvenile corrections fund — Creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury, the juvenile corrections fund. Moneys in the fund shall be utilized by the department for construction and administration of facilities under the jurisdiction of the department of juvenile corrections, for assistance to a county or series of counties in constructing, contracting for or administering detention facilities for juvenile offenders, to coordinate training for juvenile detention officers and/or juvenile probation officers, and for alternative programs designed to help juveniles avoid the traditional juvenile corrections system. All moneys in the fund may be expended only pursuant to appropriation by the legislature.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1849, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 48, p. 65; am. 1999, ch. 155, § 2, p. 431; am. 2001, ch. 15, § 3, p. 17; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 33, p. 39.

§ 20-543. Juvenile Corrections Center. [Repealed.]

§ 20-544. Body politic and corporate

Powers. [Repealed.]

§ 20-545. Powers of department of juvenile corrections. [Repealed.]

§ 20-546. Powers of director of department of juvenile corrections. [Repealed.]

§ 20-547. Construction of act — Citation of act — Other code references construed.

This act shall be liberally construed to the end that the legislative policy expressed herein is achieved. This act may be cited as the “Juvenile Corrections Act of 1995.”

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1848, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 54, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 12, p. 925; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 34, p. 39.

§ 20-548. Compensation — Amount — Crediting account of juvenile offender — Juvenile offenders not employees.

Each juvenile offender who is engaged in productive work under the jurisdiction of the director of the department of juvenile corrections may receive for this work such compensation as the director shall determine, to be paid out of any funds available in the department of juvenile corrections competency development account. After payment of restitution pursuant to section 20-538, Idaho Code, compensation shall be credited to the account of the juvenile offender to be used for payment of fines, reimbursement to the department of juvenile corrections for expenses directly related to that juvenile offender, and upon certain circumstances, payment to the juvenile offender upon release from the department of juvenile corrections.

No juvenile offender compensated under this act shall be considered an employee of the state or the department of juvenile corrections, nor shall any juvenile offender come within any of the provisions of the worker’s compensation law, or be entitled to any benefits thereunder whether on behalf of himself or any other person.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-548, as added by 1997, ch. 265, § 1, p. 755; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 35, p. 39.

§ 20-549. Curfew violations — Citation — Notification.

Violation by a juvenile offender of a curfew established by a municipal or county ordinance shall constitute an infraction and shall be punishable by a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150). Fines shall be deposited in the county juvenile justice fund of the county where the violation occurred, or if such a fund has not been established, then in the current county expense account for juvenile corrections purposes in the county where the violation occurred. Detention of a juvenile offender in a county jail or detention center for violation of a curfew is prohibited, unless the juvenile offender is an habitual status offender as defined in section 20-521, Idaho Code.

Any peace officer may issue a citation for violation of a curfew that shall thereafter proceed under the juvenile corrections act in the same manner as though the violation was charged by a petition. Citations shall be issued on the Idaho uniform citation form. The peace officer issuing a curfew citation may detain the violator and at the time the citation is issued shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the endorsement of the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian on the citation. If the endorsement of a parent or legal guardian cannot be obtained with the exercise of reasonable diligence, a copy of the citation shall be hand delivered or mailed to the juvenile’s parent or legal guardian by a peace officer at least seven (7) days prior to the date set for the juvenile’s appearance. The citation shall provide a date certain for the appearance before a magistrate of the juvenile and parent or legal guardian.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-549, as added by 1998, ch. 391, § 1, p. 1196; am. 2000, ch. 74, § 2, p. 157; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 36, p. 39; am. 2015, ch. 197, § 1, p. 607.